Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 8 2013 Transition

11-9-801.
Reserved.

Reserved. (Code 1981, §11-9-801, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.)

11-9-802.
Savings clause.

Pre-effective date transactions or liens.Except as otherwise provided in this part, this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, applies to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before July 1, 2013.

Pre-effective date proceedings.This article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, does not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2013.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-802, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.

11-9-803.
Security interest perfected before effective date.

Continuing perfection; perfection requirements satisfied.A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2013, is a perfected security interest under this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, if, on July 1, 2013, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, are satisfied without further action.

Continuing perfection; perfection requirements not satisfied.Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-805, if, immediately before July 1, 2013, a security interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable requirements for perfection under this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, are not satisfied on July 1, 2013, the security interest remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, are satisfied before July 1, 2014.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-803, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.

11-9-804.
Security interest unperfected before effective date.

A security interest that is an unperfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2013, becomes a perfected security interest:

Without further action, on July 1, 2013, if the applicable requirements for perfection under this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, are satisfied before or at that time; or

When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-804, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.

11-9-805.
Effectiveness of action taken before effective date.

Pre-effective date filing effective.The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2013, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013.

When pre-effective date filing becomes ineffective.Changes made to this article effective July 1, 2013, do not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2013, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided under the former provisions of this article in effect prior to July 1, 2013. However, except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section and Code Section 11-9-806, the financing statement ceases to be effective:

If the financing statement is filed in this state, at the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the former provisions of this article in effect prior to July 1, 2013; or

If the financing statement is filed in another jurisdiction, at the earlier of:

The time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of that jurisdiction; or

June 30, 2018.

Continuation statement.The filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, does not continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2013, continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

Application of subparagraph (b)(2)(B) of this Code section to transmitting utility financing statement.Subparagraph (b)(2)(B) of this Code section shall apply to a financing statement that, before July 1, 2013, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in the former provisions of this article, as in effect prior to July 1, 2013, only to the extent that the provisions of this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, provide that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

Application of Part 5 of this article.A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, and a continuation statement filed on or after July 1, 2013, is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of Part 5 of this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, for an initial financing statement. A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a decedent’s estate indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative within the meaning of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-503, as in effect on July 1, 2013. A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to property held in trust indicates that the collateral is held in a trust within the meaning of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-503, as in effect on July 1, 2013.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-805, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.

11-9-806.
When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement.

Initial financing statement in lieu of continuation statement.The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in Code Section 11-9-501 continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, if:

The filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013;

The pre-effective date financing statement was filed in an office in another state; and

The initial financing statement satisfies subsection (c) of this Code section.

Period of continued effectiveness.The filing of an initial financing statement under subsection (a) of this Code section continues the effectiveness of the pre-effective date financing statement:

If the initial financing statement is filed before July 1, 2013, for the period provided in former Code Section 11-9-515, as in effect prior to July 1, 2013, with respect to an initial financing statement; and

If the initial financing statement is filed on or after July 1, 2013, for the period provided in Code Section 11-9-515, as in effect on July 1, 2013, with respect to an initial financing statement.

Requirements for initial financing statement under subsection (a) of this Code section.To be effective for purposes of subsection (a) of this Code section, an initial financing statement must:

Satisfy the requirements of Part 5 of this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, for an initial financing statement;

Identify the pre-effective date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

Indicate that the pre-effective date financing statement remains effective.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-806, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.

11-9-807.
Amendment of pre-effective date financing statement.

“Pre-effective date financing statement.” As used in this Code section, the term “pre-effective date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013.

Applicable law.On or after July 1, 2013, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in, a pre-effective date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Part 3 of this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013. However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

Method of amending: general rule.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective date financing statement may be amended on or after July 1, 2013, only if:

The pre-effective date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in Code Section 11-9-501;

An amendment is filed in the office specified in Code Section 11-9-501 concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-806; or

An initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-806 is filed in the office specified in Code Section 11-9-501.

Method of amending: continuation.If the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement may be continued only under subsections (c) and (e) of Code Section 11-9-805 or Code Section 11-9-806.

Method of amending: additional termination rule.Whether or not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated on or after July 1, 2013, by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-806 has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Part 3 of this article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, as the office in which to file a financing statement.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-807, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.

11-9-808.
Person entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

The secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

The filing is necessary under this part:

To continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013; or

To perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-808, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.

11-9-809.
Priority.

This article, as in effect on July 1, 2013, determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2013, the former provisions of this article, as in effect prior to July 1, 2013, determine priority.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-809, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 20/SB 185.